Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1113
Irrigation distribution system, defined.

Irrigation distribution system shall mean any device or combination of devices having a hose, pipe, or other conduit, which connects directly to any source of ground or surface water, through which water or a mixture of water and chemicals is drawn and applied for agricultural or horticultural purposes. Irrigation distribution system shall not include any hand-held hose sprayer or other similar device which is constructed so that an interruption in water flow automatically prevents any backflow to the water source.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 13.